Alabama, session 2026rs, HB277.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) For purposes of this section, the term
"product tasting" means providing oysters at no cost to the
consumer for sampling to determine the qualities of the
oysters such as taste and texture.
(b) Notwithstanding any law or rule to the contrary,
including a permit or licensure requirement, an oyster
aquaculture licensee may harvest, shuck, and serve oysters
from the aquaculture facility for product tasting.
(c) Subsection (b) shall not be construed to exempt the
harvest of oysters from any harvest restrictions levied
pursuant to Section 9-12-126, Code of Alabama 1975.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 1

1, 2026.
HB277 Enrolled










________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 27-Jan-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 05-Mar-26 Passed



Page 2